Utah statutes.
53-10-208.1.   Magistrates and court clerks to supply information.
Every magistrate or clerk of a court responsible for court records in this
state shall, within 30 days of the disposition and on forms and in the manner
provided by the division, furnish the division with information pertaining to:
(1)  all dispositions of criminal matters, including:
(a)  guilty pleas;
(b)  convictions;
(c)  dismissals;
(d)  acquittals;
(e)  pleas held in abeyance;
(f)  judgments of not guilty by reason of insanity for a violation of:
(i)  a felony offense;
(ii)  Title 76, Chapter 5, Offenses Against the Person; or
(iii)  Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 5, Weapons;
(g)  judgments of guilty and mentally ill;
(h)  finding of mental incompetence to stand trial for a violation of:
(i)  a felony offense;
(ii)  Title 76, Chapter 5, Offenses Against the Person; or
(iii)  Title 76, Chapter 10, Part 5, Weapons; or
(i)  probations granted; and
(2)  orders of civil commitment under the terms of Section 62A-15-631;
(3)  the issuance, recall, cancellation, or modification of all warrants of
arrest or commitment as described in Rule 6, Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure
and Section 78B-6-303, within one day of the action and in a manner provided
by the division; and
(4)  protective orders issued after notice and hearing, pursuant to:
(a)  Title 77, Chapter 36, Cohabitant Abuse Procedures Act; or
(b)  Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 1, Cohabitant Abuse Act.
